Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201085-903
Information on early voting; requirements.

In addition to
the requirements of 20 U.S.C. 1094(a)(23), the University of Nebraska, each
state college, and each community college shall provide information furnished
by the Secretary of State on early voting prior to each statewide primary
and general election to each student enrolled in a degree or certificate program
and physically in attendance at the institution. The information shall include
instructions on early voting and an application to request a ballot for early
voting. The institution may provide the information electronically.

Laws 2010, LB951, § 7.